Louisiana, session 2026, HB793.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 33:5052 is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§5052. Enforcement of requirements Validity of instruments; violations; penalties
All clerks and ex-officio recorders and notaries public in all the parishes, the
parish of Orleans excepted, shall refuse to place on record any deeds of sale of
property to which R.S. 33:5051 applies until the provisions of R.S. 33:5051 have
been complied with. They shall report to the district attorney all violations thereof
coming within their knowledge.
A. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, any act of sale,
deed, plat, map, or other instrument filed for recordation in the conveyance records
of a parish to which R.S. 33:5051 through 33:5054, or R.S. 33:101 through 33:120.1,
or any local subdivision or zoning regulation applies, shall, by virtue of recordation,
constitute a certification by the filer that the instrument complies with all applicable
statutory and local requirements, including any required approval by the planning
commission or governing authority.
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1311 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 793
B. Any recorded instrument described in Subsection A of this Section that
does not comply with the requirements of state law or applicable local ordinances
shall be void ab initio and shall have no force or effect whatsoever, regardless of
when the defect is discovered.
C. The invalidity of any instrument declared void under Subsection B of this
Section shall not be cured or validated by prescription. No action or inaction by any
person or governing authority shall be deemed to create rights under such an
instrument.
D. Any person who knowingly files or causes to be filed a deed, plat, or
other instrument in violation of this Section shall be subject to both of the following:
(1) A civil penalty of not less than five hundred dollars and not more than
five thousand dollars per violation, recoverable by the governing authority or district
attorney.
(2) Criminal prosecution for filing a false public record pursuant to R.S.
14:133, where applicable.
E. Nothing in this Section shall impair the rights of third parties who acquire
property in good faith reliance on a properly approved and recorded plat or
subdivision, nor limit the remedies available to a governing authority for
enforcement of subdivision or zoning regulations.
Section 2. R.S. 33:5053 is hereby repealed in its entirety.